test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AHL_STEM_3_gt-norm.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AHL_STEM_3 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AHL_STEM_3

     áljahl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: áljaalaa
     áljahl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: áljaalaan
     áljahl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: áljaalaas
     áljahl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: áljaalaa.ang
     áljahl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: áljaal'ahlanggang
     áljahl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: áljaal'ahlanggan
     áljahl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: áljaal'ahlanggiinii
     áljahl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: áljaal'ahlans
     áljahl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: áljaalaa'ahlang
     áljahl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: áljaalaa'ahlanggaa
     áljahl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: áljaalaa'ahlanggang
     áljahl+V+REFLEXIVE: áljaal'ahl
